errortag-src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON GAVCCIGAVCCATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#gávccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#gávccát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#gávccát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#gávccát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#gávccát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GAVCCIOVCCATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#ovccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#ovccát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#ovccát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#ovccát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#ovccát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#logát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#logát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#logát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#logát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#logát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#logát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#logát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#logát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#logát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#logát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#logát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#lohki%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jd9#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4t#lot%> K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4t#lot%> K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X4#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X4#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X4#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#logi%>n K ;



LEXICON LOGI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:logi%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:logi%>jgujn K ;

LEXICON CUODICASE
čuođi+Num+Sg+Nom:čuođi%> K ;
čuođi+Num+Sg+Acc:čuođi%> K ;
čuođi+Num+Sg+Gen:čuođi%> K ;
čuođi+Num+Sg+Loc:čuođi%>s K ;
 čuođi+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:čuođi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
čuođi+Num+Pl+Nom:čuođi%>t K ;
čuođi+Num+Sg+Ill:čuohtá%>j K ;
čuođi+Num+Sg+Com:čuđi%>jn K ;
čuođi+Num+Pl+Acc:čuđi%>X5jd K ;
čuođi+Num+Pl+Gen:čuđi%>X5jd K ;
čuođi+Num+Pl+Ill:čuđi%>jde K ;
čuođi+Num+Pl+Loc:čuđi%>jn K ;
čuođi+Num+Pl+Com:čuđi%>jgujn K ;
čuohti+Num+Ess:čuohti%>n K ;


LEXICON OKTACUOHTI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#čuohti%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#čuohti%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#čuođi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#čuođi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#čuođi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#čuođi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#čuođi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#čuođi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#čuođi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#čuohtá%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#čuđi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9#čuđi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9#čuđi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde#čuđi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#čuđi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jd9#čuđi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn#čuđi%>jgujn K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
gávcci#gávccát#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
gávcci#ovccát#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIOVCCATLOHKAI ;
gávcci#logát#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCILOGATLOHKAI ;
ovcci#gávccát#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
ovcci#ovccát#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIOVCCATLOHKAI ;
ovcci#logát#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCILOGATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
gávcci#gávccát#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
gávcci#ovccát#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIOVCCATLOHKAI ;
gávcci#logát#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCILOGATLOHKAI ;
ovcci#gávccát#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
ovcci#ovccát#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIOVCCATLOHKAI ;
ovcci#logát#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCILOGATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON CUODI
čuođi#gávcci#logi:čuođi#gák'ci GAVCCILOGI ;
čuođi#ovcci#logi:čuođi#ok'ci GAVCCILOGI ;
okta#čuohti#gávcci#logi:okta#čuohti#gák'ci GAVCCILOGI ;
okta#čuohti#ovcci#logi:okta#čuohti#ok'ci GAVCCILOGI ;
čuohti#gávcci#logi:čuohti#gák'ci GAVCCILOGI ;
čuohti#ovcci#logi:čuohti#ok'ci GAVCCILOGI ;
